Massachusetts, session 194th, S2905.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8N the following section:-
Section 8O. (a) For purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“AAMVA”, the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.
“Credential”, a license issued pursuant to section 8, a learner’s permit issued under
section 8B or an identification card issued under section 8E.
“Credential holder”, the individual that has been issued a physical or electronic
credential.
“Data element”, a distinct component of a customer’s information that is found on a
registrar’s customer record.
of 5

“Electronic credential”, an electronic extension of a physical credential that conveys
identity and driving privilege information for purposes of displaying the credential on a mobile
telephone or other electronic device and is in compliance with AAMVA’s Mobile Driver License
Implementation Guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.
“Electronic credential system” or “system”, a digital process that includes a method for
provisioning electronic credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential data
elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.
“ISO”, the International Organization for Standardization, which creates uniform
processes and procedures.
“Physical credential”, a credential issued by the registrar in its physical form.
“Provision”, the initial loading of an electronic credential onto a device.
“Relying party”, the entity to which the credential holder is presenting the electronic
credential.
“Verification Process”, a method of authenticating the electronic credential through the
use of secure encrypted communication.
(b) (1) The registrar shall establish an electronic credential system subject to the
requirements of this section.
(2) The system shall require the registrar to issue an electronic credential to any
individual who is otherwise eligible to hold a physical credential. The electronic credential shall
be issued in addition to, and not instead of, a physical credential. The data elements used to build
of 5

an electronic credential shall match the data elements used by the registrar for that individual’s
physical credential.
(3) An electronic credential shall be valid for a specific period of time, to be established
by the registrar.
(4) The registrar may contract with one or more entities to develop and maintain the
electronic credential system.
(5) The registrar may enter into an agreement or contract with another department of the
commonwealth, another state, the United States or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use or
verification of an electronic credential issued under the system.
(6) An electronic credential issued by the registrar shall be in accordance with the most
recent AAMVA standards.
(7) The registrar may assess a fee for the application and provisioning of an electronic
credential.
(c) The registrar shall ensure that the:
(i) electronic credential data and the verification process complies with all data security
and privacy protection laws of the commonwealth and the United States; and
(ii) verification process requires the relying party to: (A) authenticate electronic
credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards prior to acceptance of the
electronic credential; and (B) request only electronic credential data elements that are necessary
to complete the transaction for which that data is being requested.
of 5

(d) (1) Relying Parties shall only retain electronic credential data elements for which the
relying party explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential holder. Relying parties
shall inform the electronic credential holder of the use and retention period of the electronic data
elements.
(2) The electronic credential system shall be designed to maximize the privacy of the
credential holder in accordance with state and federal law and shall not track or compile
information without the credential holder’s consent. The registrar shall only compile or disclose
information regarding use of the credential as required by state or federal law.
(e) (1) The electronic credential holder shall be required to have their physical credential
on their person while operating a motor vehicle.
(2) The electronic credential system shall be designed so that there is no requirement for
the electronic credential holder to display or relinquish possession of their mobile or electronic
device to relying parties for the acceptance of an electronic credential.
(3) Upon request by law enforcement, an electronic credential holder must provide their
physical credential.
(4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to surrender their physical credential
to law enforcement does not apply to the device on which an electronic credential has been
provisioned.
(f) (1) The display of an electronic credential shall not serve as consent or authorization
for a law enforcement officer, or any person, to search, view or access any other data or
application on the mobile device. If a person presents a mobile or electronic device to a law
of 5

enforcement officer for purposes of displaying an electronic credential, the officer shall promptly
return the device to the person once the officer has had an opportunity to verify the identity of
the person.
(2) Except for willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement office, court or
officer of the court presented with a mobile or electronic device for purposes of displaying an
electronic credential shall be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the mobile or
electronic device.
(g) The registrar shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. The regulations required under subsection (g) of section 8O of chapter 90 of
the General Laws, inserted by section 1, shall be promulgated within 270 days after passage of
this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect 270 days after passage of this act.
of 5